District of Columbia statutes.
4-261.04

Locally funded minimum benefit.

Beginning on or after January 1, 2015, but beginning no later than October 1, 2015, a family participating in the food stamp program whose federally funded household benefit is less than $30 per month shall receive locally funded benefits to bring the household’s total benefit to $30 per month.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5084
as added Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 2062, 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 18-111, § 5084, see § 2062 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 18-111, § 5084, see § 2062 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 18-111, § 5084, see § 2062 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).